Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-3904
Applicability of act.

The Indoor
Tanning Facility Act does not apply to:

(1) A physician
licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act who uses, in the practice of
medicine, medical diagnostic and therapeutic equipment that emits ultraviolet
radiation; or

(2) Any individual who owns tanning equipment exclusively for personal,
noncommercial use.

Laws 2014, LB132, § 4.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.